Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2031.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5805YH (5) 91 as/js H.F. 2031 Section 1. Section 80F.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 26. If the district court finds in favor 3 of the officer in an action brought under subsection 25, 4 upon application, the district court shall award the officer 5 equitable relief, reasonable attorney fees, expenses, and court 6 costs, which shall be paid by the prosecuting agency. This 7 subsection applies retroactively to district court rulings 8 issued on or after July 1, 2021. 9